ko: 크리켓 선수 역할: 올라운더; 타자; 투수; 수비수; 위켓키퍼; 기타
cs: Role hráče kriketu: Univerzál; Pálkař; Nadhazovač; Polař; Wicket-keeper; Ostatní
ja: クリケットプレイヤーの役割: オールラウンダー; バッツマン; ボウラー; フィールダー; ウィケットキーパー; その他
pl: Rola gracza w krykiecie: Zawodnik wszechstronny; Pałkarz; Rzucający; Gracz z pola; Obrońca bramki; Inne
pt-PT: função do jogador de críquete: Polivalente; Batedor; Lançador; Defesa; Guarda-postigo; Outro
nb: Cricketspillerrolle: Allrounder; Slagmann; Kaster; Utespiller; Wicket-keeper; Annet
sk-SK: Úloha hráča kriketu: Univerzálny hráč; Pálkar; Nadzhadzovač; Poliar; Wicket-keeper; Iné
ro-RO: Rolul jucătorului la cricket: All-rounder; Batsman; Bowler; Fielder; Wicket-keeper; Altele
de: Spielrolle im Cricket: Allrounder; Batsman; Bowler; Fielder; Wicket-Keeper; Sonstige
ru: Амплуа игрока в крикете: Олл-раундер; Бэтсмен; Боулер; Филдер; Уикет-кипер; Другое
es: Rol del jugador de críquet: Todoterreno; Bateador; Lanzador; Fildeador; Wicket-keeper; Otro
hu: Krikettjátékos pozíciója: Mindenes; Ütőjátékos; Dobójátékos; Mezőnyjátékos; Kapus; Egyéb
en: Cricket player role: All-rounder; Batsman; Bowler; Fielder; Wicket-keeper; Other
it: Giocatore di cricket figura: All-rounder; Battitore; Lanciatore; Difensore; Wicket-keeper; Altro
el: Ρόλος παίκτη κρίκετ: All-rounder; Ροπαλιστής; Ρίπτης; Παίκτης γηπέδου; Φύλακας; Άλλο
bg-BG: Роля на крикет играч: Олраундър; Батсман; Боулър; Фийлдър; Уикеткипър; Други
pt-BR: Função do jogador de críquete: All-rounder; Rebatedor; Arremessador; Defensor; Wicket-keeper; Outro
fr: Rôle du joueur de cricket: Polyvalent; Batteur; Lanceur; Chasseur; Gardien de guichet; Autre
tr: Kriket oyuncusunun rolü: Çok yönlü oyuncu; Vurucu; Atıcı; Saha savunmacısı; Wicket koruyucu; Diğer
hr-HR: Uloga igrača kriketa: All-rounder; Udarač; Bacač; Fielder; Wicket-keeper; Ostalo
fi: Krikettipelaajan pelipaikka: Yleispelaaja; Lyöjä; Syöttäjä; Ulkopelaaja; Hilanvartija; Muu
vi: Vai trò của người chơi cricket: Cầu thủ đa năng; Người đánh bóng; Người ném bóng; Người bắt bóng; Người bắt bóng sau cầu môn; Khác
zh-TW: 板球球員角色: 全能球員; 擊球員; 投球員; 守備員; 捕手; 其他
sv: Cricketspelarens roll: Allrounder; Slagman; Kastare; Utespelare; Grindvakt; Övrigt
th: บทบาทของสนับขาคริกเก็ต: ออลราวด์เดอร์; แบตส์แมน; โบว์เลอร์; ฟีลดเดอร์; วิกเกตคีปเปอร์; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 板球运动员角色: 全能手; 击球员; 投球员; 守备员; 守门员; 其他
da: Cricketspillerens rolle: Allrounder; Gærdespiller; Kaster; Markspiller; Wicket-keeper; Andet
nl: Cricketspeler rol: Allrounder; Batsman; Bowler; Fielder; Wicketkeeper; Overig
sl-SI: Vloga igralca kriketa: Vsestranski igralec; Odbijalec; Metalec; Igralec v polju; Branilec vratc; Drugo
lt-LT: Kriketo žaidėjo vaidmuo: Universalus žaidėjas; Atmušėjas; Metikas; Lauko žaidėjas; Vartų sargas; Kita